Utah statutes.
17-21-19.   Records open to inspection -- Copies.
(1)  Unless otherwise classified as private under Section 63G-2-302, all
instruments of record and all indexes required by this chapter are open to
public inspection during office hours.
(2)  Upon payment of the applicable fee, a person may obtain copies of a
public record.
